District of Columbia statutes.
47-318.05

Mayoral budget submissions required; accounting of expenditures — Cash flow statements.

The Mayor shall submit to the Council, beginning October 1, 1993, and every month thereafter, monthly consolidated cash flow statements in the same format as currently prepared by the Office of the D.C. Treasurer, except that the statement submitted to the Council shall contain an explanation of all changes in cash flows that have occurred since the previous month’s report.

Nov. 25, 1993, D.C. Law 10-64, § 7, 40 DCR 7347
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-318.5.